Utah statutes.
41-6a-1707.   Entering intersection, crosswalk, or railroad grade -- Sufficient space required.

The operator of a vehicle may not enter an intersection or a marked crosswalk or drive onto any railroad grade crossing unless there is sufficient space on the other side of the intersection, crosswalk, or railroad grade crossing to accommodate the vehicle without obstructing the passage of other vehicles, pedestrians, or railroad trains notwithstanding any traffic-control signal indication to proceed.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 2, 2005 General Session

